Montana, session 2025, HB386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Twelve-month continuous eligibility for parents, caretaker relatives,
and medicaid expansion population -- direction to department of public health and human services. (1)
The legislature directs the department of public health and human services to apply for amendments to existing
medicaid section 1115 waivers A MEDICAID SECTION 1115 WAIVER to authorize reinstatement of 12-month
continuous eligibility for medicaid coverage for:
(a) parents and caretaker relatives, as allowed prior to the waiver amendment approved March 30,
2022; and
(b) adults eligible for medicaid pursuant to Title 53, chapter 6, part 13, as allowed prior to the
waiver amendment approved December 21, 2021.
(2) The department shall submit amendments APPLY FOR THE WAIVER PROVIDED FOR IN SUBSECTION
(1) no later than September 30, 2025, to authorize 12-month continuous eligibility under:
(a) the waiver for additional services and populations, project number 11-W-00181/8, for
parents and caretaker relatives initially determined eligible for medicaid in the eligibility groups described in
section 1931 and section 1925 of the federal Social Security Act; and
(b) the health and economic livelihood partnership waiver, project number 11-W-00300/8,
for the medicaid expansion population.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 386